Washington statutes.
RCW 43.101.390

Immunity of commission.

(1) The commission and individuals acting on behalf of the commission are immune from suit in any civil or criminal action contesting or based upon proceedings or other official acts performed in the course of their duties in the administration and enforcement of this chapter.

(2) Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the commission and individuals acting on behalf of the commission are immune from suit in any civil action based on the certification, denial of certification, suspension, or other action regarding decertification of peace officers, reserve officers, or corrections officers.

[ 2021 c 323 s 16; 2001 c 167 s 11.]